Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.801

Exemption—Solicitation to promote tourism.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

When soliciting charitable gifts, grants, or donations solely for the purposes of promoting the *expansion of tourism as provided for in RCW 43.330.090, state officers and state employees are presumed not to be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift provisions in RCW 42.52.140.

[ 2003 c 153 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.330.090 was amended by 2007 c 228 s 201, deleting subsection (2) which directly related to "expansion of tourism."

Findings—2003 c 153: See note following RCW 43.330.090.